src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NMN_RAEAEKK
!! Sg_Nom: vow_mono:vow_long:vow_low:pal_no:cns_gem_ss_type
! gradation: yes
! weak geminate
! similar_to: N_CHAAQCC
!! Is for nouns with *-ast* Loc
!! ## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
!! ## 1.2 Sg.Loc in -ast (vowel shift)
!!  Raised: Sg.Ill
!!  Lowered: ELSE
!!  a-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! ## 1.2.2 Sg.Ill vowel	-u
!! ## 1.2.2.2 Lacks Palatalization
!! ## 1.2.2.2.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! ## 1.2.2.2.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! ## 1.2.2.2.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate alternation)
!!  Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! ## FORMS
!NumContLex="1.1120000000000001"
!! N_A-URaise3-32
!! * Yaml: **N-raakk**
!! grade: neutral (long_vowel, long), vowel: neutral (low)
: A-STEM_SG-NOM ;	    !!= * @CODE@ (1) Sg.Nom: rääkk
!! Sg_Nom, Sg_Nom..., Sg_Abe_Px1, Sg_Acc_Px1, Sg_Gen_Px1, Pl_Nom_Px1

!! grade: weakened (long_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
:%^KK2GG A-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) Pl.Nom: rääǥǥ
:%^KK2GG A_DER/LAZH ;
!! Sg_Abe, Sg_Acc, Sg_Gen, Pl_Nom, +Use/NG_Sg_Loc_Px..., 
!! stem_vowel: a : Sg_Loc, Sg_Com, Pl_Gen, Pl_Acc, Pl_Ill, Pl_Loc, Pl_Com, Pl_Abe

!! grade: strengthened (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: raised
:%^VV2V%^VOWRaise%>u SG-ILL ;  !!= * @CODE@ (3) Sg.Ill: rakku
:%^VV2V A_DER/SAZH ;
!! Sg_Ill

!! grade: strengthened (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
:%^VV2V A-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;           !!= * @CODE@ (5) räkk
!! Ess_Px..., Sg_Ill..., N»A

!! grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low), stem_vowel: a
:%>a ESS/PAR ; !!= * @CODE@ (6) Ess: rääkkan

!! grade: weakened (long_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: raised, stem_vowel: u/a
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^KK2GG%^VOWRaise%> N_PIISSUZH ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: raaǥǥuž
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^KK2GG%> N_PEESSAZH ; !!= * @CODE@  (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: rääǥǥaž

!! grade: allegro (short_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
:%^VV2V%^KK2GAllegro SG-LOC-PX_ALLEGRO ; !!= * @CODE@ (10) räǥ»
!! Sg_Loc_Px..

LEXICON N_RAEAEKK_PL
:%^KK2GG%>a PL-OBL ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+N:%^KK2GG PL-OBL ;
!! grade: weakened (long_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
:%^KK2GG PL-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) Pl.Nom: rääǥǥ

!! grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low), stem_vowel: a
:%>a ESS/PAR ; !!= * @CODE@ (6) Ess: rääkkan


LEXICON N_1A_VYXX
 NMN_1A_VYXX ;
LEXICON N_AELDD !!= * @CODE@ äldd:äldd
!!! inflection_type="?"
! 2.a.mono.cluster
!! N_1A_VYXX
: NMN_1A_VYXX ;
LEXICON NMN_AELDD
 NMN_1A_VYXX ;
LEXICON NMN_1A_VYXX
!! Sg_Nom: vow_mono:vow_short:vow_low:pal_no:cns_xyy
! gradation: yes
!! N_LÄINN has been integrated here
!! ## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
!! ## 1.2 Sg.Loc in -ast (vowel shift)
!!  Raised: Sg.Ill
!!  Lowered: ELSE
!!  a-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! ## 1.2.2 Sg.Ill vowel -u
!! ## 1.2.2.2 Lacks Palatalization
!! ## 1.2.2.2.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! ## 1.2.2.2.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! ## 1.2.2.2.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Cluster alternation)
!!  Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!!  Strong grade: Sg.Ill
!!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! ## FORMS
!! * Yaml: **N-aeldd**
!NumContLex="1.1120000000000001"
!! grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
: A-STEM_SG-NOM ;	    			!!= * @CODE@ (1) äldd
!! Sg_Nom, Sg_Nom..., Sg_Abe_Px1, Sg_Acc_Px1, Sg_Gen_Px1, Pl_Nom_Px1

!! grade: weakened (long_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX A-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) ääld
:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX A_DER/LAZH ;
!! Sg_Abe, Sg_Acc, Sg_Gen, Pl_Nom, +Use/NG_Sg_Loc_Px..., 
!! stem_vowel: a : Sg_Loc, Sg_Com, Pl_Gen, Pl_Acc, Pl_Ill, Pl_Loc, Pl_Com, Pl_Abe

!! grade: strengthened (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: raised
:%^VOWRaise%>u SG-ILL ;		      	!!= * @CODE@ (3) alddu
: A_DER/SAZH ;
!! Sg_Ill

!! grade: strengthened (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
: A-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;	    	  !!= * @CODE@ (5) äldd
!! Ess_Px..., Sg_Ill..., N»A

!! grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low), stem_vowel: a
:%>a ESS/PAR ;	   		    	!!= * @CODE@ (6) älddan

!! grade: weakened (long_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: raised, stem_vowel: u/a
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^VOWRaise%^YXX2YX N_PIISSUZH ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: aalduž (2009: 312-313)
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX%> N_PEESSAZH ; !!= * @CODE@  (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: ääldaž


!! grade: allegro (short_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
:%^YXX2YX SG-LOC-PX_ALLEGRO ;	  !!= * @CODE@ (10) äld
!! Sg_Loc_Px..

LEXICON N_AELDD_PL
:%>a ESS/PAR ;                          !!= * @CODE@ (6) älddan
:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX A-STEM_PL-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) ääld

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: äldd #
!!€ äldd: äldd+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ ääld: äldd+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ ääld: äldd+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ alddu: äldd+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ ääldast: äldd+N+Sg+Loc
!!€ äldstan: äldd+N+Allegro+Sg+Loc+PxSg1
!!€ ääldstan: äldd+N+Largo+Sg+Loc+PxSg1
!!€ ääldain: äldd+N+Sg+Com
!!€ älddan: äldd+N+Ess
!!€ älddad: äldd+N+Par
!!€ ääldtaa: äldd+N+Sg+Abe
!!€ ääld: äldd+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ ääldai: äldd+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ ääldaid: äldd+N+Pl+Acc
!!€ ääldaid: äldd+N+Pl+Ill
!!€ ääldain: äldd+N+Pl+Loc
!!€ ääldaivuiʹm: äldd+N+Pl+Com
!!€ ääldaitaa: äldd+N+Pl+Abe
!!€ aalduž: äldd+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom


LEXICON A-STEM_SG-NOM !!= * @CODE@ (1)
SG-NOM ;
A-STEM-PX-RETAIN ;
LEXICON A-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM  !!= * @CODE@ (2)
 SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;
:%>a SG-LOC ;
:%>a SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG: SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ; ! This is for Dictionary 2020-05-23
 A-STEM-PX-WEAKEN ;
 A-STEM-PX-WEAKEN_NG ;
DenominalAdjsCShort ;
 LAT ;

LEXICON A-STEM_PL-NOM  !!= * @CODE@ (2)
 PL-NOM ;
:%>a PL-OBL ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG: PL-OBL ;

LEXICON N_1A_VUCC
 NMN_1A_VUCC ;
LEXICON N_PEIGG !!= * @CODE@ peigg:pẹigg
!!! inflection_type="?"
!! N_1A_VUCC
 NMN_1A_VUCC ;
LEXICON NMN_PEIGG
 NMN_1A_VUCC ;
LEXICON NMN_1A_VUCC
!! Sg_Nom: vow_mono:vow_short:vow_low:pal_no:cns_vxx
! gradation: yes
! V2VV CC2C
! vowel: monophthong
!! Is for nouns with *-ast* Loc
!! ## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
!! ## 1.2 Sg.Loc in -ast (vowel shift)
!!  Raised: Sg.Ill
!!  Lowered: ELSE
!!  a-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! ## 1.2.2 Sg.Ill vowel	-u
!! ## 1.2.2.2 Lacks Palatalization
!! ## 1.2.2.2.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! ## 1.2.2.2.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! ## 1.2.2.2.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate alternation)
!!  Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! ## FORMS
!! ## (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: laainuž (2009: 310)
!NumContLex="1.1120000000000001"
!! N_A-URaise3-32
!! * Yaml: **N-laeinn**
: A-STEM_SG-NOM ;	    			 !!= * @CODE@ (1) peigg
!! Sg_Nom, Sg_Nom..., Sg_Abe_Px1, Sg_Acc_Px1, Sg_Gen_Px1, Pl_Nom_Px1

:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX A-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;	 !!= * @CODE@ (2) peeiǥ
:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX A_DER/LAZH ;
!! Sg_Abe, Sg_Acc, Sg_Gen, Pl_Nom, +Use/NG_Sg_Loc_Px..., 
!! stem_vowel: a : Sg_Loc, Sg_Com, Pl_Gen, Pl_Acc, Pl_Ill, Pl_Loc, Pl_Com, Pl_Abe

:%^VOWRaise%^VXX2YXX%>u SG-ILL ;	      	 !!= * @CODE@ (3) Sg.Ill: pijggu !!WHAT IS THIS?
:%^VXX2YXX A_DER/SAZH ;
!! Sg_Ill

: A-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;           !!= * @CODE@ (5) peigg
!! Ess_Px..., Sg_Ill..., N»A

:%>a ESS/PAR ; 	   		    	 !!= * @CODE@ (6) Ess: peigg  

+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^VOWRaise%^YXX2YX%> N_PIISSUZH ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: piiǥuž
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX%> N_PEESSAZH ; !!= * @CODE@  (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: pẹẹiǥaž


:%^YXX2YX SG-LOC-PX_ALLEGRO ; !!= * @CODE@ (10) peiǥ»
!! Sg_Loc_Px..

LEXICON N_KOAHTT !!= * @CODE@ kåhtt:kåhtt
!!! inflection_type="?"
!! N_1A_VHCC
: NMN_KOAHTT ;
LEXICON NMN_KOAHTT
!! Sg_Nom: vow_mono:vow_short:vow_low:pal_no:cns_hyy
! gradation: yes
!! similar_to: N_TAQHTT
! V2VV CC2C
!! Is for nouns with *-ast* Loc
!! ## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
!! ## 1.2 Sg.Loc in -ast (vowel shift)
!!  Raised: Sg.Ill
!!  Lowered: ELSE
!!  a-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! ## 1.2.2 Sg.Ill vowel	-u
!! ## 1.2.2.2 Lacks Palatalization
!! ## 1.2.2.2.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! ## 1.2.2.2.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! ## 1.2.2.2.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate alternation)
!!  Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! ## FORMSx
!! ## (1) Sg.Nom: kåhtt
!! ## (2) Pl.Nom: kååut
!! ## (3) Sg.Ill: kohttu
!! ## (4) Sg.Loc: kååutast
!! ## (5) Sg.Com: kååutain
!! ## (6) Ess: kåhttan
!! ## (7) Par: kåhttad
!! ## (8) Pl.Acc: kååutaid
!! ## (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: kooutuž (2009: 310)
!NumContLex="1.1120000000000001"
!! N_A-URaise3-32
!! * Yaml: **N-taehtt**
!! grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
: A-STEM_SG-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) Sg.Nom: kåhtt
!! Sg_Nom, Sg_Nom..., Sg_Abe_Px1, Sg_Acc_Px1, Sg_Gen_Px1, Pl_Nom_Px1

!! grade: weakened (long_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
:%^V2VV%^YXX2VX A-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) Pl.Nom: kååut
:%^V2VV%^YXX2VX A_DER/LAZH ;
!! Sg_Abe, Sg_Acc, Sg_Gen, Pl_Nom, +Use/NG_Sg_Loc_Px..., 
!! stem_vowel: a : Sg_Loc, Sg_Com, Pl_Gen, Pl_Acc, Pl_Ill, Pl_Loc, Pl_Com, Pl_Abe

!! grade: strengthened (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: raised
:%^VOWRaise%>u SG-ILL ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) Sg.Ill: kohttu
: A_DER/SAZH ;
!! Sg_Ill

!! grade: strengthened (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
: A-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;           !!= * @CODE@ (5) kåhtt
!! Ess_Px..., Sg_Ill..., N»A

!! grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low), stem_vowel: a
:%>a ESS/PAR ; !!= * @CODE@ (6) Ess: kåhttan

!! grade: weakened (long_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: raised, stem_vowel: u/a
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^VOWRaise%^YXX2VX%> N_PIISSUZH ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: kooutuž
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^YXX2VX%> N_PEESSAZH ; !!= * @CODE@  (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: kååutaž


!! grade: allegro (short_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
:%^YXX2VX SG-LOC-PX_ALLEGRO ; !!= * @CODE@ (10) kåut»
!! Sg_Loc_Px..


!! CLASS 1 LOW VOWEL, DIPHTHONG, NO PALATALIZATION NOMINALS

LEXICON N_1A_VWYKK !!= * @CODE@ teâlkk:teâlkk
: NMN_1A_VWYKK ;
LEXICON N_TEYLKK !!= * @CODE@ teâlkk:teâlkk
!!! inflection_type="?"
!! compare N_1A_VWYXX
: NMN_1A_VWYKK ;
